Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6609
Trade secret; confidentiality.

Except for the identity of a recipient of tax credits under the Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit Act and the amount of such credits, any information or record in the possession of the Department of Economic Development or Department of Revenue with respect to the act shall be presumed by such departments to be a trade secret and shall be kept confidential by such departments unless otherwise ordered by a court.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 75.